California, session 20252026, AB265.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 8 (commencing with Section 12100.80) is added to Chapter 1.6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read: Article 8. Small Business Recovery Fund Act12100.80. This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Small Business Recovery Fund Act.12100.81. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Severe weather-related and natural disaster events have caused significant economic and operational disruptions to small businesses across California.(b) Recovery, rebuilding, and investments in resilient infrastructure are essential to ensuring businesses remain viable and contribute to California’s economic stability.(c) Establishing a recovery fund will provide essential support to impacted entities and promote long-term resilience against future disasters.12100.83. (a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature for purposes of this article, the Office of Small Business Advocate shall allocate 90 percent of the moneys appropriated to the Small Business Recovery Fund, which shall be created within the State Treasury, for purposes of a small business recovery grant program to provide competitive grants to small businesses that are directly impacted by a state of emergency proclaimed by the Governor, a local emergency proclaimed by the governing body of a city, county, or city and county, or other state of emergency, including, but not limited to, earthquakes, natural or man-made disasters specific to that jurisdiction, conditions of extreme peril to persons or property, or a state of war emergency.(b) The grant program shall prioritize funding for eligible small businesses affected by the natural disasters referenced in the Governor’s Proclamation of a State of Emergency, issued January 7, 2025, and by any subsequent disasters covered by a proclamation of a state of emergency issued by the Governor while the fund is in existence.12100.84. (a) Funds awarded pursuant to the small business recovery grant program shall be used for the following purposes:(1) To support recovery and rebuilding efforts for grantees.(2) To promote investment in more resilient infrastructure, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (A) Infrastructure upgrades and improvements.(B) Relocation of electrical or business equipment.(C) Business relocation to more secure locations within the state.(D) Investment in additional insurance coverage.(3) To ensure that grantees can reopen and remain viable.(b) Grant funds may be used retroactively for work already performed in response to the proclaimed disaster, provided sufficient documentation is submitted to the Office of Small Business Advocate.12100.85. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), and in accordance with Section 12100.86, a small business, as defined in Section 14837, may apply for funds under the small business recovery grant program.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), funds shall not be awarded to any of the following: (1) Foundations and charitable trusts.(2) Gambling establishments.(3) Adult entertainment establishments.(4) Hospitals or nursing facilities. (5) Rental property businesses.12100.86. An applicant for the small business recovery grant program shall meet the following qualifications:(a) The applicant shall be current with all state payroll taxes, sales taxes, and income taxes, as applicable.(b) The applicant was not the subject of an order for relief in bankruptcy as of the date of the declared disaster.(c) The applicant has not permanently ceased operations.(d) The applicant is not barred from receiving federal or state funds.12100.87. (a) The Office of Small Business Advocate shall award grants pursuant to the small business recovery grant program through a competitive process. (1) The rating criteria for the grant application may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:(A) The viability of the applicant’s recovery plan.(B) The applicant’s ability to match grant funds.(C) The efficacy and long-term impact of the applicant’s proposed recovery efforts.(2) Preference in awarding grants shall be given to applicants who receive technical assistance through the Small Business Technical Assistance Program administered by the Office of Small Business Advocate. (b) The office shall award grants in amounts that range from two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), inclusive.(c) A grantee shall match on a dollar-for-dollar basis, the amount of the funds awarded pursuant to the small business recovery grant program. The applicant may use funds received from insurance claims, small business association recovery loans, or in-kind contributions to satisfy the match requirement.12100.88. (a) The Office of Small Business Advocate shall allocate 10 percent of the funds appropriated to the Small Business Recovery Fund for both of the following purposes:(1) Five percent shall be allocated to the Small Business Technical Assistance Program for grants to small business technical assistance centers that provide direct service to disaster-affected areas.(2) Five percent shall be allocated to the Capital Infusion Program, administered by the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, to support increased demand for capital-related technical assistance in disaster areas.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that funds allocated pursuant to this section be prioritized to provide outreach and assistance to small businesses owned by ethnic minorities, women, and other disenfranchised segments of the population.12100.89. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature to evaluate the effectiveness of the Small Business Recovery Fund periodically and appropriate additional funds as necessary to address ongoing and future disaster recovery needs.(b) The Director of the Office of Small Business Advocate shall prepare a report on the results of grant funds awarded pursuant to this article for each state of emergency proclaimed by the Governor. The director shall submit a report to the Legislature on or before 180 days after a state of emergency is proclaimed by the Governor. The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795.12100.90. This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.